tests/чикӗ.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах чикӗ":
    чикӗ<n><nom> :  чикӗ 
    чикӗ<n><gen> :  чиккӗн 
    чикӗ<n><dat> :  чикке 
    чикӗ<n><loc> :  чикӗре 
    чикӗ<n><abl> :  чикӗрен 
    чикӗ<n><ins> :  чикӗпе 
    чикӗ<n><abe> :  чикӗсӗр 
    чикӗ<n><ben> :  чикӗшӗн
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><nom> :  чиккӗм 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><gen> :  чиккӗмӗн 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><dat> :  чиккӗме 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><loc> :  чиккӗмре 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><abl> :  чиккӗмрен 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><ins> :  чиккӗмпе 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><abe> :  чиккӗмсӗр 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><ben> :  чиккӗмшӗн
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><nom> :  чиккӳ 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><gen> :  чиккӳн 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><dat> :  чиккӳне 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><loc> :  чиккӳнте 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><abl> :  чиккӳнтен 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><ins> :  чиккӳпе 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><abe> :  чиккӳсӗр 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><ben> :  чиккӳшӗн
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><nom> :  чикки 
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><gen> :  чиккин
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><dat> :  чиккине 
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><loc> :  чиккинче 
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><abl> :  чиккинчен 
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><ins> :  чиккипе 
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><abe> :  чиккисӗр 
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><ben> :  чиккишӗн
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><nom> :  чиккӗмӗр 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><gen> :  чиккӗмӗрӗн 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><dat> :  чиккӗмӗре 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><loc> :  чиккӗмӗрте 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><abl> :  чиккӗмӗртен 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><ins> :  чиккӗмӗрпе 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><abe> :  чиккӗмӗрсӗр 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><ben> :  чиккӗмӗршӗн
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><nom> :  чиккӗр 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><gen> :  чиккӗрӗн 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><dat> :  чиккӗре 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><loc> :  чиккӗрте 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><abl> :  чиккӗртен 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><ins> :  чиккӗрпе 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><abe> :  чиккӗрсӗр 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><ben> :  чиккӗршӗн
    чикӗ<n><pl><nom> :  чикӗсем 
    чикӗ<n><pl><gen> :  чикӗсен 
    чикӗ<n><pl><dat> :  чикӗсене 
    чикӗ<n><pl><loc> :  чикӗсенче 
    чикӗ<n><pl><abl> :  чикӗсенчен 
    чикӗ<n><pl><ins> :  чикӗсемпе 
    чикӗ<n><pl><abe> :  чикӗсемсӗр 
    чикӗ<n><pl><ben> :  чикӗсемшӗн
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  чиккӗмсем 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  чиккӗмсен 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  чиккӗмсене 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  чиккӗмсенче 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  чиккӗмсенчен 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  чиккӗмсемпе 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  чиккӗмсемсӗр 
    чикӗ<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  чиккӗмсемшӗн
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  чиккӳсем 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  чиккӳсен 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  чиккӳсене 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  чиккӳсенче 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  чиккӳсенчен 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  чиккӳсемпе 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  чиккӳсемсӗр 
    чикӗ<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  чиккӳсемшӗн
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  чиккисем 
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  чиккисен 
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  чиккисене 
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  чиккисенче 
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  чиккисенчен 
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  чиккисемпе 
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  чиккисемсӗр 
    чикӗ<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  чиккисемшӗн
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  чиккӗмӗрсем 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  чиккӗмӗрсен 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  чиккӗмӗрсене 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  чиккӗмӗрсенче 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  чиккӗмӗрсенчен 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  чиккӗмӗрсемпе 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  чиккӗмӗрсемсӗр 
    чикӗ<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  чиккӗмӗрсемшӗн
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  чиккӗрсем 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  чиккӗрсен 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  чиккӗрсене 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  чиккӗрсенче 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  чиккӗрсенчен 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  чиккӗрсемпе 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  чиккӗрсемсӗр 
    чикӗ<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  чиккӗрсемшӗн
